Vermont, session 2025-2026, H412.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Road Rule * * *
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 6001 is amended to read:
§ 6001. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(3)(A) “Development” means each of the following:
* * *
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 2 of 94
(xii) The construction of a road or roads and any associated
driveways to provide access to or within a tract of land owned or controlled by
a person. For the purposes of determining jurisdiction under this subdivision,
any new development or subdivision on a parcel of land that will be provided
access by the road and associated driveways is land involved in the
construction of the road.
(I) Jurisdiction under this subdivision shall not apply unless the
length of any single road is greater than 800 feet, or the length of all roads and
any associated driveways in combination is greater than 2,000 feet.
(II) As used in this subdivision (xii), “roads” include any new
road or improvement to a class 4 town highway by a person other than a
municipality, including roads that will be transferred to or maintained by a
municipality after their construction or improvement. Routine maintenance
and minor repairs of a Class 4 highway shall not constitute an “improvement.”
Routine maintenance shall include replacing a culvert or ditch, applying new
stone, grading, or making repairs after adverse weather. Routine maintenance
shall not include changing the size of the road, changing the location or layout
of the road, or adding pavement.
(III) For the purpose of determining the length of any road and
associated driveways, the length of all other roads and driveways within the
tract of land constructed after July 1, 2026 shall be included.
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 3 of 94
(IV) This subdivision (xii) shall not apply to:
(aa) a State or municipal road, a utility corridor of an
electric transmission or distribution company, or a road used primarily for
farming or forestry purposes;
(bb) development within a Tier 1A area established in
accordance with section 6034 of this title or a Tier 1B area established in
accordance with section 6033 of this title; and
(cc) improvements underway when this section takes effect
to a Class 4 highway that will be transferred to the municipality.
(V) The conversion of a road used for farming or forestry
purposes that also meets the requirements of this subdivision (xii) shall
constitute development.
(VI) The intent of this subdivision (xii) is to encourage the
design of clustered subdivisions and development that does not fragment Tier 2
areas or Tier 3 areas.
(xiii) The construction of improvements for commercial,
industrial, or residential purposes in a Tier 3 area as determined by rules
adopted by the Board.
* * *
(D) The word “development” does not include:
* * *
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 4 of 94
(viii)(I) The construction of a priority housing project in a
municipality with a population of 10,000 or more.
(II) If the construction of a priority housing project in this
subdivision (3)(D)(viii) involves demolition of one or more buildings that are
listed or eligible to be listed on the State or National Register of Historic
Places, this exemption shall not apply unless the Division for Historic
Preservation has made the determination described in subdivision (A)(iv)(I)(ff)
of this subdivision (3) and any imposed conditions are enforceable in the
manner set forth in that subdivision.
(III) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, and in addition to the provisions exemption subsection 6081(p) of
this chapter, until January July 1, 2027 2035, the construction of a priority
housing project or related subdivision located entirely within areas of a
designated downtown development district, designated neighborhood
development area, or a designated growth center or within one-half mile
around such designated center with permanent zoning and subdivision bylaws
served by public sewer or water services or soils that are adequate for
wastewater disposal or extending to the terminus of the areas served by public
sewer or water services if beyond the one-half mile area. Construction must be
substantially completed by June 30, 2035. For purposes of this subdivision
(III), in order for a parcel to qualify for the exemption, at least 51 percent of
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 5 of 94
the parcel shall be located within one-half mile of the designated center
boundary. If the one-half mile around the designated center extends into an
adjacent municipality, the legislative body of the adjacent municipal may
inform the Board that it does not want the exemption to extend into that area.
* * *
(28) “Mixed use” means construction of both mixed income residential
housing and construction of space for any combination of commercial and
public purposes, including retail, office, services, artisan, and recreational,
municipal, State, and community facilities, provided at least 40 percent of the
gross floor area of the buildings involved is mixed income residential housing.
“Mixed use” does not include industrial use.
* * *
(35) “Priority housing project” means a discrete project located on a
single tract or multiple contiguous tracts of land that consists exclusively of
mixed income housing or mixed use, or any combination thereof with mixed
income housing, and is located entirely within a designated downtown
development district, designated new town center, designated growth center, or
designated neighborhood development area under 24 V.S.A. chapter 76A or
within a downtown or village center, village area, or planned growth area as
defined in 24 V.S.A. chapter 139.
* * *
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 6 of 94
(46) “Tier 3” means an area consisting of critical natural resources
defined by the rules of the Board. The Board’s rules shall at a minimum
determine whether and how to protect river corridors, headwater streams,
habitat connectors of statewide significance, riparian areas, class A waters,
natural communities, and other critical natural resources. [Repealed.]
* * *
(51) “Transit route” means a set route or network of routes on which a
public transit service as defined in 24 V.S.A. § 5088 operates a regular
schedule and as may be further defined by Board rule.
(52) “Infill” or “infill development” means the use of vacant land or
property within an existing settlement for further construction or development.
* * * Repeal of Road Construction Rulemaking * * *
Sec. 2. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 20 is amended to read:
Sec. 20. RULEMAKING; ROAD CONSTRUCTION
The Natural Resources Board may adopt rules after consulting with
stakeholders, providing additional specificity to the necessary elements of 10
V.S.A. § 6001(3)(A)(xii). It is the intent of the General Assembly that any
rules encourage the design of clustered subdivisions and development that does
not fragment Tier 2 areas or Tier 3 areas. [Repealed.]
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 7 of 94
* * * Jurisdictional Opinions * * *
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 6007 is amended to read:
§ 6007. ACT 250 DISCLOSURE STATEMENT; JURISDICTIONAL
DETERMINATION
* * *
(c) With respect to the partition or division of land, or with respect to an
activity that might or might not constitute development, any person may
submit to the district coordinator an “Act 250 Disclosure Statement” and other
information required by the rules of the Board and may request a jurisdictional
opinion from the district coordinator on behalf of the Board concerning the
applicability of this chapter. A district coordinator’s decision made on behalf
of the Board that a land use application is substantially incomplete shall be
treated as a jurisdictional opinion. If a requestor wishes a final determination
to be rendered on the question, the district coordinator, on behalf of the Board,
at the expense of the requestor and in accordance with rules of the Board, shall
publish notice of the issuance of the opinion in a local newspaper generally
circulating in the area where the land that is the subject of the opinion is
located and shall serve the opinion on all persons listed in subdivisions
6085(c)(1)(A) through (D) of this title. In addition, the requestor who is
seeking a final determination shall consult with the district coordinator, on
behalf of the Board, and obtain approval of a subdivision 6085(c)(1)(E) list of
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 8 of 94
persons who shall be notified by the district coordinator because they are
adjoining property owners or other persons who would be likely to be able to
demonstrate a particularized interest protected by this chapter that may be
affected by an act or decision by a District Commission.
(d) Completeness. An application that is incomplete in substantial respects
shall not be accepted for filing by the district coordinator and therefore shall
not initiate the time and notice requirements of the chapter and the associated
rules. A district coordinator’s decision that an application is substantially
incomplete shall be treated as a jurisdictional opinion pursuant to this section.
* * * Land Use Review Board * * *
Sec. 4. 10 V.S.A. § 6021 is amended to read:
§ 6021. BOARD; VACANCY; REMOVAL
(a) Board established. The Land Use Review Board is created.
(1) The Board shall consist of five members appointed by the Governor
after review and approval by the Land Use Review Board Nominating
Committee in accordance with subdivision (2) of this subsection and
confirmed with the advice and consent of the Senate, so that one appointment
expires in each year. The Chair and the other four members shall be full-time
positions. In making these appointments, the Governor and the Senate shall
give consideration to candidates who have experience, expertise, or skills
relating to one or more of the following areas: environmental science; land use
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 9 of 94
law, policy, planning, and development; and community planning. All
candidates shall have a commitment to environmental justice.
(A) The Governor shall appoint a chair of the Board, a position that
shall be a full-time position. The Governor shall ensure Board membership
reflects, to the extent possible, the racial, ethnic, gender, and geographic
diversity of the State. The Board shall not contain two members who reside in
the same county.
(B) Following initial appointments, the members shall be appointed
for terms of five years. All terms after initial appointments shall begin on July
February 1 and expire on June 30 January 31. A member may continue
serving until a successor is appointed. The initial appointments shall be for
staggered terms of one year, two years, three years, four years, and five years.
* * *
(d) Disqualified members. The Chair of the Board, upon request of the
Chair of a District Commission, may appoint and assign former Commission
members to sit on specific Commission cases matters when some or all of the
regular members and alternates of the District Commission are disqualified or
otherwise unable to serve. If necessary to achieve a quorum, the Chair of the
Board may appoint a member of a District Commission who has not worked
on the case matter to sit on a specific case matter before the Board.
* * *
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 10 of 94
Sec. 5. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 11 is amended to read:
Sec. 11. LAND USE REVIEW BOARD APPOINTMENTS; REVISION
AUTHORITY
* * *
(d) The Land Use Review Board is the successor entity to the Natural
Resources Board, and all rights, obligations, and authority of the Natural
Resources Board are hereby transferred to the Land Use Review Board,
including with respect to contracts, settlements, appeals, enforcement, policies,
rulemaking, and guidance. This succession is retroactive to January 1, 2025.
The rules of the Natural Resources Board in effect on December 31, 2024 shall
become rules of the Land Use Review Board. In those rules, the Land Use
Review Board is authorized to change all references to the Natural Resources
Board so that they refer to the Land Use Review Board. Unless accompanied
by one or more other revisions to the rules, such a change need not be made
through the rulemaking process under the Administrative Procedure Act.
* * * Tier 1B * * *
Sec. 6. 10 V.S.A. § 6033 is amended to read:
§ 6033. REGIONAL PLAN FUTURE LAND USE MAP REVIEW
* * *
(c) To obtain a Tier 1B area status under this section the regional planning
commission shall demonstrate to the Board that the municipalities with Tier 1B
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 11 of 94
areas meet the following requirements as included in subdivision 24 V.S.A.
§ 4348a(a)(12)(C):
(1) The municipality has not requested to opt out to have the area
mapped for Tier 1B. A municipality may request to opt out of Tier 1B area
status by submitting a resolution passed by the municipality to the relevant
regional planning commission and the Board.
* * *
(6) The municipality has municipal staff, municipal officials, or regional
planning commission staff or other contracted capacity adequate to support
development review and zoning administration in the Tier 1B area.
* * * Tier 1A * * *
Sec. 7. 10 V.S.A. § 6034 is amended to read:
§ 6034. TIER 1A AREA STATUS
(a) Application and approval.
(1) Beginning on January September 1, 2026, a municipality, by
resolution of its legislative body, may shall be able to apply to the Land Use
Review Board for Tier 1A status for the area of the municipality that is suitable
for dense development and meets the requirements of subsection (b) of this
section. A municipality may apply for multiple noncontiguous areas to be
receive Tier 1A area status. Applications may be submitted at different times.
* * *
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 12 of 94
(b) Tier 1A area status requirements.
(1) To obtain a Tier 1A area status under this section, a municipality
shall demonstrate to the Board that it has each of the following:
* * *
(F) The Tier 1A area is compatible with the character of adjacent
National Register Historic Districts, National or State Register Historic Sites,
and other significant cultural and natural resources identified by local or State
government.
(G) The municipality has identified and planned for the maintenance
of significant natural communities, rare, threatened, and endangered species
located in the Tier 1A area or excluded those areas from the Tier 1A area.
(H) Public water and wastewater systems or planned improvements
have the capacity to support additional development within the Tier 1A area.
(I)(G) Municipal or regional planning commission staff or other
contracted capacity adequate to support coordinated comprehensive and capital
planning, development review, and zoning administration in the Tier 1A area.
* * *
* * * Tier 1A Area Guidelines * * *
Sec. 8. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 29 is amended to read:
Sec. 29. TIER 1A AREA GUIDELINES
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 13 of 94
On or before January March 1, 2026, the Land Use Review Board shall
publish guidelines to direct municipalities seeking to obtain the Tier 1A area
status. The guidelines shall include how a municipality shall demonstrate that
improvements are planned for a public water or wastewater system and at what
stage in the process the improvements need to be to provide a reasonable
expectation of completion.
Sec. 9. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 22 is amended to read:
Sec. 22. TIER 3 RULEMAKING CRITICAL ENVIRONMENTAL
RESOURCES WORKING GROUP
(a) The Land Use Review Board, in consultation with the Secretary of
Natural Resources, shall adopt rules undertake a study to implement
investigate the necessity of and requirements for the administration of 10
V.S.A. § 6001(3)(A)(xiii) and 10 V.S.A. § 6001(46) and (19) an additional
Tier or expanded criteria for Act 250 jurisdiction covering critical
environmental resources. It is the intent of the General Assembly that these
rules the study identify critical natural resources for protection. The Board
shall review the a potential definition of Tier 3 area these areas; determine the
critical natural resources that shall may be included in Tier 3, giving due
consideration to river corridors, headwater streams, habitat connectors of
statewide significance, riparian areas, class A waters, and natural communities;
any additional critical natural resources that should may be added to the
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 14 of 94
definition; measures to ensure that no municipality or region is
disproportionately impacted by Tier 3 designation expanding protection of
these areas that would limit reasonable opportunities for Tier 1 or Tier 2
designations; and how to define the boundaries. Rules adopted by the Board
The study shall include:
(1) any necessary clarifications to how the Tier 3 definition is or
additional criteria would be used in 10 V.S.A. chapter 151, including whether
and how subdivisions would be covered under the jurisdiction of Tier 3;
(2) any necessary changes to how 10 V.S.A. § 6001(3)(A)(xiii)
construction of improvements for commercial, industrial, or residential
purposes in the areas affected should be administered and when jurisdiction
should be triggered to protect the functions and values of resources of critical
natural resources;
(3) the process for how Tier 3 these areas will be mapped or identified
by the Agency of Natural Resources and the Board; and
(4) other policies or programs that shall may be developed to review
development impacts to Tier 3 these areas if they are not included in 10 V.S.A.
§ 6001(46); and
(5) if a critical natural resource area is not recommended for protection
under Tier 3, it shall be identified in the rule, and a rationale shall be provided
as to why the critical resource was not selected for Tier 3 protection.
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 15 of 94
(b) On or before January 1, 2025, the Board shall convene a working group
of stakeholders to provide input to the rule prior to prefiling with the
Interagency Committee on Administrative Rules study prior to submission to
the General Assembly. The working group As part of the study, the Board
shall include hear from representation from regional planning commissions;
environmental groups; science and ecological research organizations;
woodland or forestry organizations; the Vermont Housing and Conservation
Board; the Vermont Chamber of Commerce; the League of Cities of Towns;
the Land Access and Opportunity Board; the State Natural Resources
Conservation Council; and other stakeholders, such as the Vermont Ski Areas
Association, the Department of Taxes, Division of Property Valuation and
Review, the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation, the Department of
Environmental Conservation, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the
Vermont Woodlands Association, and the Professional Logging Contractors of
the Northeast.
(c) The Board shall file a final proposed rule with the Secretary of State
and Legislative Committee on Administrative Rules the study with the House
Committee on Environment and the Senate Committee on Natural Resources
and Energy on or before February 1, 2026. After the Land Use Review Board
files the rule with Legislative Committee on Administrative Rules, it shall
submit a report describing the rules and the issues reviewed under this section
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 16 of 94
to the House Committee on Environment and Energy and the Senate
Committee on Natural Resources and Energy.
(d) During the rule development study, the stakeholder group established
under subsection (b) of this section shall solicit participation from
representatives of municipalities and landowners that host Tier 3 potential
critical resource areas on their properties to determine the responsibilities and
education needed to understand, manage, and interact with the resources.
Sec. 10. REPEAL.
2024 Acts and Resolves No. 181, Sec. 14. (criterion 8(C) rulemaking) is
repealed.
* * * Act 250 Exemptions * * *
Sec. 11. 10 V.S.A. § 6081 is amended to read:
§ 6081. PERMITS REQUIRED; EXEMPTIONS
* * *
(p) No permit or permit amendment is required for a priority housing
project or related subdivision in a designated center if the project remains
below any applicable jurisdictional threshold specified in subdivision
6001(3)(A)(iv)(I) of this title.
* * *
(y) Until December 31, 2030 July 1, 2035, no permit or permit amendment
is required for a retail electric distribution utility’s rebuilding of existing
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 17 of 94
electrical distribution lines and related facilities to improve reliability and
service to existing customers, through overhead or underground lines in an
existing corridor, road, or State or town road right-of-way. Nothing in this
section shall be interpreted to exempt projects under this subsection from other
required permits or the conditions on lands subject to existing permits required
by this section.
(z)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary,
no permit or permit amendment is required for any subdivision, development,
or change to an existing project, as defined by Board rules, that is located
entirely within a Tier 1A area under section 6034 of this chapter. Units
constructed pursuant to this subsection shall not count towards the total units
constructed in other Tier areas.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary,
no permit or permit amendment is required within a Tier 1B area approved by
the Board under section 6033 of this chapter for the subdivision for or
construction of 50 units or fewer of housing on a tract or tracts of land
involving 10 acres or less or for mixed-use development with 50 units or fewer
of housing on a tract or tracts of land involving 10 acres or less. Units
constructed pursuant to this subsection shall not count towards the total units
constructed in other Tier areas.
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 18 of 94
(A) No permit or permit amendment is required for any subdivision,
development, or change to an existing project, as defined by Board rules, for
priority housing projects in Tier 1B eligible areas up to 50 units.
(B) No permit or permit amendment is required for any subdivision,
development, or change to an existing project, as defined by Board rules, for
priority housing projects in Tier 1B areas up to 75 units.
(3) Upon receiving notice and a copy of the permit issued by an
appropriate municipal panel pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 4460(g), a previously
issued permit for a development or subdivision located in a Tier 1A area shall
remain attached to the property. However, neither the Board nor the Agency
of Natural Resources shall enforce the permit or assert amendment jurisdiction
on the tract or tracts of land unless the designation is revoked terminated or the
municipality has not taken any reasonable action to enforce the conditions of
the permit. The permit may also be discharged upon request of the permittee
pursuant to section 6091of this chapter.
(aa) No permit or permit amendment is required for the construction of
improvements for a hotel or motel converted to permanently affordable
housing developments as defined in 24 V.S.A. § 4303(2).
(bb) Until July 1, 2028 July 1, 2035, no permit or permit amendment is
required for the construction of improvements for one accessory dwelling unit
constructed within or appurtenant to a single-family dwelling. Units
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 19 of 94
constructed pursuant to this subsection shall not count towards the total units
constructed in other projects.
(cc) Until July 1, 2028 July 1, 2035, no permit amendment is required for
the construction of improvements for converting a structure used for a
commercial purpose nonresidential structure to 29 or fewer housing units.
(dd) Interim housing exemptions.
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, until
January 1, 2027 July 1, 2035, no permit or permit amendment is required for
the subdivision for or the construction of housing projects and mixed-use
development such as cooperatives, condominiums, dwellings, or mobile
homes, with 75 units or fewer, constructed or maintained on a tract or tracts of
land, located entirely within the areas of a designated new town center, a
designated growth center, or a designated neighborhood development area
served by public sewer or water services or soils that are adequate for
wastewater disposal. Housing units constructed pursuant to this subdivision
shall not count towards the total units constructed in other areas. This
exemption shall not apply to areas within mapped river corridors and
floodplains identified flood hazard and fluvial erosion areas except those areas
containing preexisting development in areas suitable for infill development as
defined in 29-201 of the Vermont Flood Hazard Area and River Corridor Rule
or unless the municipality has adopted flood hazard and river corridor bylaws
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 20 of 94
applicable to the entire municipality that are consistent with the standards
established pursuant to subsections 755(b) and 428(b) of this title.
(2)(A) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, until
July 1, 2027 2035, no permit or permit amendment is required for the
subdivision for or the construction of housing projects and mixed-use
development such as cooperatives, condominiums, dwellings, or mobile
homes, with 50 or fewer units, constructed or maintained on a tract or tracts of
land of 10 acres or less, located entirely within:
(i) areas of a designated village center and within one-quarter mile
of its boundary with permanent zoning and subdivision bylaws and served by
public sewer or water services or soils that are adequate for wastewater
disposal or extending to the terminus of the area served by public sewer or
water services if beyond the one-quarter mile area; or
(ii) areas of a municipality that are within a census-designated
urbanized area adjusted federal aid urban areas as approved by the federal
highway administration with over 50,000 residents and or within one-quarter
mile of a transit route in existence and mapped as of July 1, 2024 and which
may be further defined and updated by Board rule or guidance.
(B) Housing units constructed pursuant to this subdivision (2) shall
not count towards the total units constructed in other areas. This exemption
shall not apply to areas within mapped river corridors and floodplains
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 21 of 94
identified flood hazard and fluvial erosion areas, except those areas containing
preexisting development in areas suitable for infill development as defined in
29-201 of the Vermont Flood Hazard Area and River Corridor Rule or unless
the municipality has adopted flood hazard and river corridor bylaws applicable
to the entire municipality that are consistent with the standards established
pursuant to subsections 755(b) and 428(b) of this title. For purposes of this
subdivision, in order for a parcel to shall qualify for the exemption, at least 51
percent if any part of the parcel shall be is located within one-quarter mile of
the designated village center boundary or the center line of the transit route. If
the one-quarter mile extends into an adjacent municipality, the legislative body
of the adjacent municipal may inform the Board that it does not want the
exemption to extend into that area.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, until
January 1, 2027 July 1, 2035, no permit or permit amendment is required for
the construction of or subdivision for, or the housing projects and mixed use
development such as cooperatives, condominiums, dwellings, or mobile
homes, constructed or maintained on a tract or tracts of land, located entirely
within a designated downtown development district with permanent zoning
and subdivision bylaws served by public sewer or water services or soils that
are adequate for wastewater disposal or extending to the terminus of the areas
served by public sewer or water services if beyond area of the development
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 22 of 94
district. Housing units constructed pursuant to this subdivision shall not count
towards the total units constructed in other areas. This exemption shall not
apply to areas within mapped river corridors and floodplains except those areas
containing preexisting development in areas suitable for infill development as
defined in 29-201 of the Vermont Flood Hazard Area and River Corridor Rule
or unless the municipality has adopted flood hazard and river corridor bylaws
applicable to the entire municipality that are consistent with the standards
established pursuant to subsections 755(b) and 428(b) of this title.
(4) This subsection is effective retroactively to July 1, 2023. Any
project permitted after July 1, 2023 that meets the requirements of this
subsection may seek a discharge of the permit from the District Commission.
* * * Discharge of Act 250 Permits and Jurisdiction * * *
Sec. 12. 10 V.S.A. § 6091 is amended to read:
§ 6091. RENEWALS; AND DISCHARGE; NONUSE
* * *
(e) Discharge of permits. Existing permits and jurisdiction encumbering a
parcel may be discharged by the District Commission or LURB upon request
of the parcel owner or permittee if the parcel is changed to a use that would not
otherwise trigger jurisdiction or the parcel falls within an area otherwise
exempt from jurisdiction as approved by LURB. The District Commission or
LURB may deny a request for permit discharge if the permit contains ongoing
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 23 of 94
conditions that relate to the use of the property. The LURB shall be
responsible for continued review and enforcement of these conditions. A
denial of a request for discharge may be appealed to Environmental Division
of the Superior Court.
Sec. 13. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 47, Sec. 16a is amended to read:
Sec. 16a. ACT 250 EXEMPTION REQUIREMENTS
In order to qualify for the exemptions established in 10 V.S.A. § 6001
(3)(A)(xi) and (3)(D)(viii)(III), a A person shall may request a jurisdictional
opinion under 10 V.S.A. § 6007 on or before June 30, 2026 to confirm a
project is exempted under-exemptions established in 10 V.S.A. § 6001
(3)(A)(xi) and (3)(D)(viii)(III). The jurisdictional opinion shall require the
project to substantially complete construction on or before June 30, 2029 July
1, 2035 in order to remain exempt. A jurisdictional opinion is not required to
utilize the exemption.
* * * LURB Public Meeting Exemption * * *
Sec. 14. 1 V.S.A. § 312 is amended to read:
§ 312. RIGHT TO ATTEND MEETINGS OF PUBLIC AGENCIES
* * *
(e) Nothing in this section or in section 313 of this title shall be construed
as extending to the Judicial Branch of the Government of Vermont or of any
part of the same or to the Public Utility Commission or the Land Use Review
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 24 of 94
Board established in 10 V.S.A. § 6021; nor shall it extend to the deliberations
of any public body in connection with a quasi-judicial proceeding; nor shall
anything in this section be construed to require the making public of any
proceedings, records, or acts which are specifically made confidential by the
laws of the United States of America or of this State.
* * *
* * * Community Investment Board Transition * * *
Sec. 15. 24 V.S.A. § 5802(f) is amended to read:
(f) In addition to any other duties confirmed by law, the State Board shall
have the following duties:
* * *
(6) To assume authority over any remaining powers and responsibilities
of the former Downtown Board established under 24 V.S.A. chapter 76A. The
Community Investment Board is the successor entity of the Downtown Board
with all due rights, duties, and authority transferred thereto.
* * * Designation Transition * * *
Sec. 16. 24 V.S.A. § 4348 is amended to read:
§ 4348. ADOPTION AND AMENDMENT OF REGIONAL PLAN
* * *
(g) A regional plan or amendment shall be adopted by not less than a 60
percent vote of the commissioners representing municipalities, in accordance
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 25 of 94
with the bylaws of the regional planning commission. A regional plan shall be
effective upon adoption for regional purposes and will remain effective for
purposes other than future land use mapping if not approved by the Land Use
Review Board.
* * *
(p) Regional planning commissions shall adopt a regional plan in
conformance with this title after July 1, 2025 and on or before December 31,
2026.
Sec. 17. 24 V.S.A. § 5803 is amended to read:
§ 5803. DESIGNATION OF DOWNTOWN AND VILLAGE CENTERS
(a) Designation established. A regional planning commission may apply to
the LURB for approval and designation of all centers by submitting the
regional plan future land use map adopted by the regional planning
commission. The regional plan future land use map shall identify downtown
centers and village centers as the downtown and village areas eligible for
designation as centers. The Department and State Board shall provide
comments to the LURB on areas eligible for center designation as provided
under this chapter.
* * *
(e) Transition. All designated downtowns, village centers, or new town
centers existing as of December 31, 2025 will retain current benefits until
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 26 of 94
December 31, 2026 2027 or until approval of the regional future land use maps
by the LURB, whichever comes first. All existing designations in effect
December 31, 2025 will expire December 31, 2026 2027 if the regional plan
does not receive LURB approval under this chapter. All benefits for unexpired
designated downtowns, village centers, and new town centers that are removed
under this chapter shall remain in effect until July 1, 2034 2035. Prior to June
30, 2026 2027, no check-in or renewals shall be required for the preexisting
designations. New applications for downtowns, villages, and new town centers
may be approved by the State Board prior to the first public hearing on a
regional future land use map or until December 31, 2025, whichever comes
first.
(f) Benefits Steps. A center may receive the benefits associated with the
steps in this section by meeting the established requirements. The Department
shall review applications from municipalities to advance from Step One to
Two and from Step Two to Three and issue written decisions. The Department
shall issue a written administrative decision within 30 days following an
application. If a municipal application is rejected by the Department, the
municipality may appeal the administrative decision to the State Board. To
maintain a downtown approved under chapter 76A after December 31, 2026
2035, the municipality shall apply for renewal following a regional planning
approval by the LURB and meet the program requirements. Step Three
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 27 of 94
designations that are not approved for renewal revert to Step Two. The
municipality may appeal the administrative decision of the Department to the
State Board. Appeals of administrative decisions shall be heard by the State
Board at the next meeting following a timely filing stating the reasons for the
appeal. The State Board’s decision is final. The Department shall issue
guidance to administer these steps.
* * *
Sec. 18. 24 V.S.A. § 5804 is amended to read:
§ 5804. DESIGNATED NEIGHBORHOOD
* * *
(b) Transition. All designated growth center or neighborhood development
areas existing as of December 31, 2025 will retain current benefits until
December 31, 2026 2027 or upon approval of the regional plan future land use
maps, whichever comes first. All existing neighborhood development area and
growth center designations in effect on December 31, 2025 will expire on
December 31, 2026 2027 if the regional plan future land use map is not
approved. All benefits that are removed for unexpired neighborhood
development areas and growth centers under this chapter shall remain active
with prior designations existing as of December 31, 2025 until December 31,
2034 2035. Prior to December 31, 2026 2027, no check-ins or renewal shall be
required for the existing designations. New applications for neighborhood
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 28 of 94
development area designations may be approved by the State Board prior to
the first hearing for a regional plan adoption or until December 31, 2025,
whichever comes first.
* * *
* * * Appeals * * *
* * * Priority for Act 250 and LURB Appeals * * *
Sec. 19. 10 V.S.A. § 6089 is amended to read:
§ 6089. APPEALS
(a) Appeals of any act or decision of a District Commission under this
chapter or a district coordinator under subsection 6007(c) of this title shall be
made to the Environmental Division in accordance with chapter 220 of this
title. For the purpose of this section, a decision of the Chair of a District
Commission under section 6001e of this title on whether action has been taken
to circumvent the requirements of this chapter shall be considered an act or
decision of the District Commission.
(b) Except cases the Court considers of greater importance, proceedings
involving development of residential housing before the Environmental
Division of the Superior Court and appeals there from take precedence on the
docket over all cases and shall be assigned for hearing and trial or for argument
at the earliest practicable date and expedited in every way.
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 29 of 94
* * * Municipal Zoning Appeals * * *
Sec. 20. 24 V.S.A. § 4465 is amended to read:
§ 4465. APPEALS OF DECISIONS OF THE ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICER
* * *
(b) As used in this chapter, an “interested person” means any one of the
following:
* * *
(4) Any 20 persons A minimum of 20 percent of the most recent U.S.
Census Bureau population estimate of the municipality who may be any
combination of voters, residents, or real property owners within a municipality
listed in subdivision (2) of this subsection who, by signed petition to the
appropriate municipal panel of a municipality, the plan or a bylaw of which is
at issue in any appeal brought under this title, allege that any relief requested
by a person under this title, if granted, will not be in accord with the policies,
purposes, or terms of the plan or bylaw of that municipality. This petition to
the appropriate municipal panel must designate one person to serve as the
representative of the petitioners regarding all matters related to the appeal. For
purposes of this subdivision, an appeal shall not include the character of the
area affected if the project has a residential component that includes affordable
housing.
* * *
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 30 of 94
(d) A party appealing a land use decision must demonstrate a clear and
substantial departure from the comprehensive plan or land use regulation that
directly affects the party’s property.
* * * Priority for Hearing of Housing Appeals * * *
Sec. 21. 24 V.S.A. § 4471 is amended to read:
§ 4471. APPEAL TO ENVIRONMENTAL DIVISION
* * *
(f) Except cases the Court considers of greater importance, proceedings
involving development of residential housing before the Environmental
Division of the Superior Court and appeals there from take precedence on the
docket over all cases and shall be assigned for hearing and trial or for argument
at the earliest practicable date and expedited in every way.
(g) A party appealing a land use decision must demonstrate a clear and
substantial departure from the comprehensive plan or land use regulation that
directly affects the party’s property.
Sec. 22. 10 V.S.A. § 8504 is amended to read:
§ 8504. APPEALS TO THE ENVIRONMENTAL DIVISION
* * *
(k) Limitations on appeals. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
section:
* * *
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 31 of 94
(4) it shall be the goal of the Environmental Division to hear cases
involving development of residential housing within 60 days and to issue a
decision on a case involving development of residential housing or regarding
an appeal of an appropriate municipal panel decision under 24 V.S.A. chapter
117 within 90 days following the close of the hearing.
* * *
* * * Attorney’s Fees and Costs * * *
Sec. 23. 10 V.S.A. § 8507 is added to read:
§ 8507. LEGAL FEES AND ASSOCIATED COSTS OF APPEAL
(a) If an aggrieved person elects to appeal the judgment of the appropriate
municipal panel on an approved application for a project involving residential
housing to the court under this chapter, and the court rules in favor of the
applicant, the court shall require the aggrieved person to compensate, in a
sufficient sum as the court directs, the permit applicant for an amount not to
exceed $50,000.00 consisting of:
(1) the permit applicant’s reasonable attorney’s fees; and
(2) tangible costs incurred by the permit applicant in defending the
permit, such as costs of studies and other analysis.
(b) The court may grant dispensation from the compensation required in
subsection (a) of this section for aggrieved persons that can demonstrate undue
hardship due to income status or other factors in the court’s discretion.
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 32 of 94
* * * Downtown and Village Center Tax Credits * * *
Sec. 24. 32 V.S.A. § 5930ee is amended to read:
§ 5930ee. LIMITATIONS
Beginning in fiscal year 2010 and thereafter, the State Board may award tax
credits to all qualified applicants under this subchapter, provided that:
(1) the total amount of tax credits awarded annually, together with sales
tax reallocated under section 9819 of this title, does not exceed $3,000,000.00
$5,000,000.00;
* * *
* * * Consistency of Flood Planning Requirements * * *
Sec. 25. 24 V.S.A. § 4348a is amended to read:
§ 4348a. ELEMENTS OF A REGIONAL PLAN
(a) A regional plan shall be consistent with the goals established in section
4302 of this title and shall include the following:
* * *
(12) A future land use element, based upon the elements in this section,
that sets forth the present and prospective location, amount, intensity, and
character of such land uses in relation to the provision of necessary community
facilities and services and that consists of a map delineating future land use
area boundaries for the land uses in subdivisions (A)–(J) of this subdivision
(12) as appropriate and any other special land use category the regional
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 33 of 94
planning commission deems necessary; descriptions of intended future land
uses; and policies intended to support the implementation of the future land use
element using the following land use categories:
(A) Downtown or village centers. These areas are the mixed-use
centers bringing together community economic activity and civic assets. They
include downtowns, villages, and new town centers previously designated
under chapter 76A and downtowns and village centers seeking benefits under
the Community Investment Program under section 5804 of this title. The
downtown or village centers are the traditional and historic central business
and civic centers within planned growth areas, village areas, or may stand
alone. Village centers are not required to have public water, wastewater,
zoning, or subdivision bylaws.
(B) Planned growth areas. These areas include the high-density
existing settlement and future growth areas with high concentrations of
population, housing, and employment in each region and town, as appropriate.
They include a mix of historic and nonhistoric commercial, residential, and
civic or cultural sites with active streetscapes, supported by land development
regulations; public water or wastewater, or both; and multimodal transportation
systems. These areas include new town centers, downtowns, village centers,
growth centers, and neighborhood development areas previously designated
under chapter 76A of this title. These areas should generally meet the smart
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 34 of 94
growth principles definition in chapter 139 of this title and the following
criteria:
(i) The municipality has a duly adopted and approved plan and a
planning process that is confirmed in accordance with section 4350 of this title
and has adopted bylaws and regulations in accordance with sections 4414,
4418, and 4442 of this title.
(ii) This area is served by public water or wastewater
infrastructure.
(iii) The area is generally within walking distance from the
municipality’s or an adjacent municipality’s downtown, village center, new
town center, or growth center.
(iv) The Unless the municipality has adopted flood hazard and
river corridor bylaws applicable to the entire municipality that are consistent
with the standards established pursuant to 10 V.S.A. § 755 (State flood hazard
area standards) and 10 V.S.A. § 1428 (river corridor protection), the area
excludes identified flood hazard and river corridor areas, except those areas
containing preexisting development in areas suitable for infill development as
defined in section 29-201 of the Vermont Flood Hazard Area and River
Corridor Rule.
* * *
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 35 of 94
* * * Wetlands * * *
Sec. 26. 10 V.S.A. § 902 is amended to read:
§ 902. DEFINITIONS
Wherever used or referred to in this chapter, unless a different meaning
clearly appears from the context:
* * *
(7) “Class II wetland” means a wetland other than a Class I or Class III
wetland that:
(A) is a mapped wetland identified on the Vermont significant
wetlands inventory maps; or
(B) is an unmapped wetland that the Secretary determines to merit
protection, pursuant to section 914 of this title, based upon an evaluation of the
extent to which it serves the functions and values set forth in subdivision
905b(18)(A) of this title and the rules of the Department.
(8) “Class III wetland” means a wetland that is neither a Class I wetland
nor a Class II wetland.
(9) “Buffer zone” means an area contiguous to a significant wetland that
protects the wetland’s functions and values.
(A) The Except as provided in subdivision (B) of this subdivision (9):
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 36 of 94
(i) the buffer zone for a Class I wetland shall extend at least 100
feet from the border of the wetland, unless the Department determines
otherwise under section 915 of this title. The; and
(ii) the buffer zone for a Class II wetland shall extend at least 50
feet from the border of the wetland unless the Secretary determines otherwise
under section 914 of this title.
(B) The buffer zone of a Class II wetland shall be 25 feet when the
wetland is located in:
(i) an industrial park, as that term is defined in subdivision 212(7)
of this title, that is permitted under chapter 151 of this title;
(ii) designated centers designated under 24 V.S.A. chapter 76A;
(iii) Tier 1A and Tier 1B areas approved by the Land Use Review
Board; or
(iv) locations meeting the requirements established in subsection
6081(z) of this title as eligible for an interim exemption from the permit or
permit amendment requirements of chapter 151 of this title.
(10) “Panel” means the Water Resources Panel of the Agency of Natural
Resources.
(11) “Significant wetland” means any Class I or Class II wetland.
(12)(11) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Natural Resources or the
Secretary’s authorized representative.
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 37 of 94
(13)(12) “Dam removal” has the same meaning as in section 1080 of
this title.
Sec. 27. 10 V.S.A. § 913 is amended to read:
§ 913. PROHIBITION
(a) Except for allowed uses adopted by the Department by rule, no person
shall conduct or allow to be conducted an activity in a significant wetland or
buffer zone of a significant wetland except in compliance with a permit,
conditional use determination, or order issued by the Secretary.
(b) A permit shall not be required under this section for:
(1) any activity that occurred before the effective date of this section
unless the activity occurred within:
(A) an area identified as a wetland on the Vermont significant
wetlands inventory maps;
(B) a wetland that was contiguous to an area identified as a wetland
on the Vermont significant wetlands inventory maps; or
(C) the buffer zone of a wetland referred to in subdivision (A) or (B)
of this subdivision (1);
(2) any construction within a wetland that is identified on the Vermont
significant wetlands inventory maps or within the buffer zone of such a
wetland, provided that the construction was completed prior to February 23,
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 38 of 94
1992, and no action for which a permit is required under the rules of the
Department was taken or caused to be taken on or after February 23, 1992; or
(3) any construction or activity in an unmapped Class II wetland located
in:
(i) an industrial park, as that term is defined in subdivision 212(7)
of this title, that is permitted under chapter 151 of this title;
(ii) designated centers designated under 24 V.S.A. chapter 76A;
(iii) Tier 1A and Tier 1B areas approved by the Land Use Review
Board; or
(iv) locations meeting the requirements established in subsection
6081(z) of this title as eligible for an interim exemption from the permit or
permit amendment requirements of chapter 151 of this title.
Sec. 28. 10 V.S.A. § 914 is amended to read:
§ 914. WETLANDS DETERMINATIONS
(a) The Secretary may, upon a petition or on his or her the Secretary’s own
motion, determine whether any wetland is a Class II or Class III wetland. Such
The Secretary’s determinations shall be based on an evaluation of the functions
and values set forth in subdivision 905b(18)(A) of this title and the rules of the
Department.
(b) The Secretary may establish the necessary width of the buffer zone of
any Class II wetland as part of any wetland determination pursuant to the rules
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 39 of 94
of the Department, except that buffer zone of a Class II wetland shall be 25
feet when the wetland is located in:
(1) an industrial park, as that term is defined in subdivision 212(7) of
this title, that is permitted under chapter 151 of this title;
(2) designated centers designated under 24 V.S.A. chapter 76A;
(3) Tier 1A and Tier 1B areas approved by the Land Use Review Board;
or
(4) locations meeting the requirements established in subsection 6081(z)
of this title as eligible for an interim exemption from the permit or permit
amendment requirements of chapter 151 of this title.
* * *
Sec. 29. 10 V.S.A. § 918 is amended to read:
§ 918. NET GAIN OF WETLANDS; STATE GOAL; RULEMAKING
(a) On or before July 1, 2025 2026, the Secretary of Natural Resources
shall amend the Vermont Wetlands Rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to
clarify that the goal of wetlands regulation and management in the State is the
net gain of wetlands to be achieved through protection of existing wetlands and
restoration of wetlands that were previously adversely affected. This condition
shall not apply to wetland, river, and flood plain restoration projects, including
dam removals.
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 40 of 94
(b)(1) The Vermont Wetlands Rules shall prioritize the protection of
existing intact wetlands from adverse effects.
(2) Where a permitted activity in a wetland will cause more than 5,000
square feet of adverse effects that cannot be avoided, the Secretary shall
mandate that the permit applicant restore, enhance, or create wetlands or
buffers to compensate for the adverse effects on a wetland. The amount of
wetlands to be restored, enhanced, or created shall be calculated, at a
minimum, by determining the acreage or square footage of wetlands
permanently drained or filled as a result of the permitted activity and
multiplying that acreage or square footage by two, to result in a ratio of 2:1
restoration to wetland loss, except that a ratio of 1:1 restoration to wetland loss
shall apply in:
(A) an industrial park, as that term is defined in subdivision 212(7) of
this title, that is permitted under chapter 151 of this title;
(B) designated centers designated under 24 V.S.A. chapter 76A;
(C) Tier 1A and Tier 1B areas approved by the Land Use Review
Board; or
(D) locations meeting the requirements established in subsection
6081(z) of this title as eligible for an interim exemption from the permit or
permit amendment requirements of chapter 151 of this title.
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 41 of 94
(3) Establishment of a buffer zone contiguous to a wetland shall not
substitute for the restoration, enhancement, or creation of wetlands. Adverse
impacts to wetland buffers shall be compensated for based on the effects of the
impact on wetland function.
* * *
Sec. 30. 10 V.S.A. § 919 is amended to read:
§ 919. WETLANDS PROGRAM REPORTS
(a) On or before April 30, 2025, and annually thereafter, the Secretary of
Natural Resources shall submit to the House Committee on Environment and
Energy and to the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Energy a report
on annual losses and gains of significant wetlands in the State. The report shall
include:
(1) the location and acreage of Class II wetland and buffer losses
permitted by the Agency in accordance with section 913 of this title, for which
construction of the permitted project has commenced;
(2) the acreage of Class II wetlands and buffers gained through permit-
related enhancement and restoration, and an estimate of wetlands gained
through wetlands, river, and floodplain restoration projects, including dam
removals;
(3) the number of site visits and technical assistance calls conducted by
the Agency of Natural Resources, the number of permits processed by the
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 42 of 94
Agency, and any enforcement actions that were taken by the Agency or the
Office of the Attorney General in the previous year for violations of this
chapter; and
(4) an updated mitigation summary of the extent of wetlands restored
on-site compared with compensation performed off-site, in-lieu fees paid, or
conservation.
* * *
(c) On or before December 15, 2025, the Agency of Natural Resources
shall publish on its website and submit to the House Committee on
Environment and to the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Energy
wetland guidance on the mitigation and compensation sequence contemplated
in the Vermont Wetland Rules subsections 9.5(b) and (c). The guidance shall
clearly identify the process applicants should follow and the information and
proof necessary to demonstrate a project has practicably avoided and
minimized wetland impacts and is eligible for mitigation during the State
wetland permit application process.
* * * Potable Water Supply and Wastewater System Connections * * *
Sec. 31. 10 V.S.A. § 1971 is amended to read:
§ 1971. PURPOSE
It is the purpose of this chapter to:
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 43 of 94
(1) establish a comprehensive program to regulate the construction,
replacement, modification, and operation of potable water supplies and
wastewater systems in the State in order to protect human health and the
environment, including potable water supplies, surface water, and
groundwater;
* * *
(6) allow delegation of the permitting program created by this chapter to
municipalities demonstrating the capacity to administer the chapter allow
delegation to municipalities of technical review of potable water supply and
wastewater system connections pursuant to the rules of the Agency adopted
under this chapter.
Sec. 32. 10 V.S.A. § 1972 is amended to read:
§ 1972. DEFINITIONS
For the purposes of this chapter:
* * *
(6) “Potable water supply” means the source, treatment, and conveyance
equipment used to provide water used or intended to be used for human
consumption, including drinking, washing, bathing, the preparation of food, or
laundering. This definition includes a service connection to a public water
system of any size that does not require a permit pursuant to Chapter 56 of this
title. This definition does not include any internal piping or plumbing, except
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 44 of 94
for mechanical systems, such as pump stations and storage tanks or lavatories,
that are located inside a building or structure and that are integral to the
operation of a potable water system. This definition also does not include a
potable water supply that is subject to regulation under chapter 56 of this title.
* * *
(10) “Wastewater system” means any piping, pumping, treatment, or
disposal system used for the conveyance and treatment of sanitary waste or
used water, including carriage water, shower and wash water, and process
wastewater. This definition does not include any internal piping or plumbing,
except for mechanical systems, such as pump stations and storage tanks or
toilets, that are located inside a building or structure and that are integral to the
operation of a wastewater system. This definition also does not include
wastewater systems that are used exclusively for the treatment and disposal of
animal manure. In this chapter, “wastewater system” refers to a soil-based
disposal system of less than 6,500 gallons per day, or a sewerage sanitary
sewer collection system connection of any size.
Sec. 33. 10 V.S.A. § 1973 is amended to read:
§ 1973. PERMITS
(a) Except as provided in this section and sections 1974 and 1978 of this
title, a person shall obtain a permit from the Secretary before:
* * *
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 45 of 94
(7) making a new or modified connection to a new or existing potable
water supply or wastewater system; or
* * *
(f)(1) The Secretary shall give deference to a certification by a licensed
designer with respect to the engineering design or judgment exercised by the
designer in order to minimize Agency review of certified designs. Nothing in
this section shall limit the responsibility of the licensed designer to comply
with all standards and rules, or the authority of the Secretary to review and
comment on design aspects of an application or to enforce Agency rules with
respect to the design or the design certification.
(2) The Secretary shall issue a permit for a new or modified connection
to a water main and a sewer main or indirect discharge system from a building
or structure in a designated downtown development district upon submission
of an application under subsection (b) of this section that consists solely of the
certification of a licensed designer, in accordance with subsection (d) of this
section, and a letter from the owner of the water main and sewer main or
indirect discharge system allocating the capacity needed to accommodate the
new or modified connection. However, this subdivision (2) shall not apply if
the Secretary finds one of the following:
(A) The Secretary has prohibited the system that submitted the
allocation letter from issuing new allocation letters due to a lack of capacity.
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 46 of 94
(B) As a result of an audit of the application performed on a random
basis or in response to a complaint, the system is not designed in accordance
with the rules adopted under this chapter.
* * *
(k)(1) The Secretary shall adopt a general permit for municipal potable
water supply and wastewater system connections that are reviewed by
municipalities with authority delegated pursuant to section 1976 of this
chapter.
(2) The Secretary may adopt by rule general permitting program for
other activities permitted under this section.
Sec. 34. 10 V.S.A. § 1976 is amended to read:
§ 1976. DELEGATION OF CONNECTION AUTHORITY TO
MUNICIPALITIES
(a)(1) The Secretary may delegate to a municipality authority to:
(A) implement all sections of this chapter, except for sections 1975
and 1978 of this title; or
(B) implement permitting under this chapter for the subdivision of
land, a building or structure, or a campground when the subdivision, building
or structure, or campground is served by sewerage connections and water
service lines, provided that:
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 47 of 94
(i) the lot, building or structure, or campground utilizes both a
sanitary sewer service line and a water service line; and
(ii) the water main and sanitary sewer collection line that the water
service line and sanitary sewer service line are connected to are owned and
controlled by the delegated municipality.
(2) If a municipality submits a written request for delegation of this
chapter, the Secretary shall delegate authority to the municipality to implement
and administer provisions of this chapter, the rules adopted under this chapter,
and the enforcement provisions of chapter 201 of this title relating to this
chapter, provided that the Secretary is satisfied that the municipality:
(A) has established a process for accepting, reviewing, and processing
applications and issuing permits, that shall adhere to the rules established by
the Secretary for potable water supplies and wastewater systems, including
permits, by rule, for sewerage connections;
(B) has hired, appointed, or retained on contract, or will hire, appoint,
or retain on contract, a licensed designer to perform technical work that must
be done by a municipality under this section to grant permits;
(C) will take timely and appropriate enforcement actions pursuant to
the authority of chapter 201 of this title;
(D) commits to reporting annually to the Secretary on a form and date
determined by the Secretary ;
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 48 of 94
(E) will only issue permits for water service lines and sanitary sewer
service lines when there is adequate capacity in the public water supply system
source, wastewater treatment facility, or indirect discharge system; and
(F) will comply with all other requirements of the rules adopted under
section 1978 of this title The Secretary may delegate to a municipality
authority to conduct technical review of municipal potable water supply and
wastewater system connections provided that the water main and sanitary
sewer collection line that the water service line and sanitary sewer service line
are connected to are owned and controlled by the delegated municipality.
(2) If a municipality submits a request for delegation of authority under
this subsection, the Secretary shall delegate authority to the municipality to
implement and administer provisions of this chapter governing municipal
potable water supply and wastewater system connections provided that the
municipality:
(A) is qualified to perform the technical review as determined by the
Secretary;
(B) receives authorization from the municipal legislative body to
administer a program for review of potable water supply and wastewater
system connections;
(C) meets any other requirement for the delegation program as
adopted by the Secretary in writing;
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 49 of 94
(D) will only issue permits for water service lines and sanitary sewer
service lines when there is adequate capacity in the public water system,
wastewater treatment facility, or indirect discharge system; and
(E) complies with the requirements for connection and all
requirements of the Agency’s rules adopted under section 1978 of this title.
* * *
(f) The Secretary may review municipal implementation of this section on
a random basis, or in response to a complaint, or on his or her the Secretary’s
own motion. This review may include consideration of the municipal
implementation itself, as well as consideration of the practices, testing
procedures employed, systems designed, system designs approved, installation
procedures used, and any work associated with the performance of these tasks.
Sec. 35. 3 V.S.A. § 2822(j) is amended to read:
(j) In accordance with subsection (i) of this section, the following fees are
established for permits, licenses, certifications, approvals, registrations, orders,
and other actions taken by the Agency of Natural Resources.
* * *
(4) For potable water supply and wastewater permits issued under 10
V.S.A. chapter 64. Projects under this subdivision include: a wastewater
system, including a sewerage sanitary sewer collection system connection; and
a potable water supply, including a connection to a public water supply system:
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 50 of 94
(A) Original applications, or major amendments for a project with the
following proposed design flows. In calculating the fee, the highest proposed
design flow whether wastewater or water shall be used:
(i) design flows 560 gpd or less: $306.25 per application;
(ii) design flows greater than 560 and less than or equal to 2,000
gpd: $870.00 per application;
(iii) design flows greater than 2,000 and less than or equal to
6,500 gpd: $3,000.00 per application;
(iv) design flows greater than 6,500 and less than or equal to
10,000 gpd: $7,500.00 per application;
(v) design flows greater than 10,000 gpd: $13,500.00 per
application.
(B) Minor amendments: $150.00.
(C) Minor projects: $270.00.
As used in this subdivision (j)(4)(C), “minor project” means a project
that meets the following: there is an increase in design flow but no
construction is required; there is no increase in design flow, but construction is
required, excluding replacement potable water supplies and wastewater
systems; or there is no increase in design flow and no construction is required,
excluding applications that contain designs that require technical review.
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 51 of 94
(D) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this subdivision (4),
when a project is located in a Vermont neighborhood, as designated under 24
V.S.A. chapter 76A, the fee shall be no not more than $50.00 in situations in
which the application has received an allocation for sewer capacity from an
approved municipal system. This limitation shall not apply in the case of fees
charged as part of a duly delegated municipal program.
(E) Projects permitted under a municipal potable water supply or
wastewater system connection general permit as established in 10 V.S.A.
§ 1973(i)(1) or as adopted by rule per 10 V.S.A. § 1973(i)(2): $500.
* * *
* * * Municipal Aid for Water Supply and Water Pollution Abatement and
Control * * *
Sec. 36. 10 V.S.A. § 1628 is amended to read:
§ 1628. PRIORITIES
(a) The Department shall make grant awards under this chapter to eligible
municipal water pollution abatement and control projects on the basis of need
as determined according to a system of priorities adopted by rule by the
Department and to the extent appropriate funds are available. The system of
priorities shall require consideration of criteria, including:
(1) whether a project is grant or loan eligible;
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 52 of 94
(2) the condition of the waters affected by the project and whether the
waters are:
(A) not in compliance with the Vermont Water Quality Standards; or
(B) have a total maximum daily load (TMDL);
(3) whether the project will address water quality issues identified in a
basin plan;
(4) whether the project will abate or control pollution that is causing or
may cause a threat to public health;
(5) whether the project will address an emergency situation affecting or
constituting a threat to the environment or the public health, safety, or welfare;
(6) if the project repairs or replaces existing infrastructure, the condition
and integrity of such infrastructure;
(7) whether the project incorporates principles of environmental
resiliency or sustainability, including energy efficiency, which reduce the
environmental impacts of the project or a water pollution abatement and
control facility;
(8) the fiscal integrity and sustainability of the project, including
whether the project is a cost-effective alternative, when compared to other
alternatives;
(9) whether the project serves a designated center;
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 53 of 94
(10) affordability factors for the municipality or municipalities in which
the project is located, including:
(A) median household income;
(B) unemployment rate; and
(C) population trends; and
(11) if the project removes a pollutant for which the water or waters
affected by the project are impaired, the cost-effectiveness of the project at
removing that pollutant.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the demonstration
requirements of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of
Environmental Conservation, Environmental Protection Rules, Chapter 2 -
Municipal Pollution Control Priority System, Subchapter 300, shall be met
when the municipality making application for funding under this chapter
certifies that the project shall include service for new housing units or
wastewater capacity shall be reserved for new housing units.
* * * Vermont Rental Housing Improvement Program * * *
Sec. 37. 10 V.S.A. § 699 is amended to read:
§ 699. VERMONT RENTAL HOUSING IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM
(a) Creation of Program.
* * *
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 54 of 94
(5)(A) The Department may cooperate with and subgrant funds to State
agencies and governmental subdivisions and public and private organizations
in order to carry out the purposes of this subsection.
(B) Entities carrying out the provisions of this section, including
grantees, subgrantees, and contractors of the State, shall be exempt from the
provisions of 8 V.S.A. chapter 73 (licensed lenders, mortgage brokers,
mortgage loan originators, sales finance companies, and loan solicitation
companies).
* * *
(d) Program requirements applicable to grants and forgivable loans.
(1)(A) A grant or loan shall not exceed:
(i) $70,000.00 per unit, for rehabilitation or creation of an eligible
rental housing unit meeting the applicable building accessibility requirements
under the Vermont Access Rules; or
(ii) $50,000.00 per unit, for rehabilitation or creation of any other
eligible rental housing unit. Up to an additional $20,000.00 per unit may be
made available for specific elements that collectively bring the unit to the
visitable standard outlined in the rules adopted by the Vermont Access Board.
* * *
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 55 of 94
(e) Program requirements applicable to grants and five-year forgivable
loans. For a grant or five-year forgivable loan awarded through the Program,
the following requirements apply for a minimum period of five years:
(1) A landlord shall coordinate with nonprofit housing partners and local
coordinated entry homelessness service organizations approved by the
Department to identify potential tenants.
(2)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(B) of this subsection (e), a
landlord shall lease the unit to a household that is:
(i) exiting homelessness, including any individual under 25 years
of age who secures housing through a master lease held by a youth service
provider on behalf of individuals under 25 years of age;
(ii) actively working with an immigrant or refugee resettlement
program; or
(iii) composed of at least one individual with a disability who
receives or is eligible approved to receive Medicaid-funded home and
community based services or Social Security Disability Insurance; or
(iv) with approval from the Department in writing, an organization
that will hold a master lease that explicitly states the unit will be used in
service of the populations described in this subsection (e).
* * *
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 56 of 94
(4)(A) A landlord may convert a grant to a forgivable loan upon
approval of the Department and the housing organization that approved the
grant.
(B) A landlord who converts a grant to a forgivable loan shall receive
a 10-percent prorated credit for loan forgiveness for each year in which the
landlord participates in the Program.
(f) Requirements applicable to 10-year forgivable loans. For a 10-year
forgivable loan awarded through the Program, the following requirements
apply for a minimum period of 10 years:
(1) A landlord shall coordinate with nonprofit housing partners and local
coordinated entry organizations to identify potential tenants The total cost of
rent for the unit, including utilities not covered by rent payments, shall not
exceed the applicable fair market rent established by the Department of
Housing and Urban Development, except that a landlord may accept a housing
voucher that exceeds fair market rent, if available.
(2)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(B) of this subsection (f), a
landlord shall lease the unit to a household that is:
(i) exiting homelessness, including any individual under 25 years
of age who secures housing through a master lease held by a youth service
provider on behalf of individuals under 25 years of age;
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 57 of 94
(ii) actively working with an immigrant or refugee resettlement
program; or
(iii) composed of at least one individual with a disability who is
eligible to receive Medicaid-funded home and community based services.
(B) If, upon petition of the landlord, the Department or the housing
organization that issued the grant determines that a household under
subdivision (2)(A) of this subsection (f) is not available to lease the unit, then
the landlord shall lease the unit:
(i) to a household with an income equal to or less than 80 percent
of area median income; or
(ii) if such a household is unavailable, to another household with
the approval of the Department or housing organization.
(3)(A) A landlord shall accept any housing vouchers that are available to
pay all, or a portion of, the tenant’s rent and utilities.
(B) If no housing voucher or federal or State subsidy is available, the
cost of rent for the unit, including utilities not covered by rent payments, shall
not exceed the applicable fair market rent established by the Department of
Housing and Urban Development.
(4) The Department shall forgive 10 percent of the amount of a
forgivable loan for each year a landlord participates in the loan program.
* * *
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 58 of 94
(i) Creation of the Vermont Rental Housing Improvement Program
Revolving Fund. Funds repaid or returned to the Department from forgivable
loans or grants funded by the Program shall return to the Vermont Rental
Housing Improvement Revolving Fund to be used for Program expenditures
and administrative costs at the discretion of the Department.
* * * MHIR * * *
Sec. 38. 10 V.S.A. § 700 is added to read:
§ 700. VERMONT MANUFACTURED HOME IMPROVEMENT AND
REPAIR PROGRAM
(a) There is created within the Department of Housing and Community
Development the Manufactured Home Improvement and Repair Program. The
Department shall design and implement the Program to award funding to
statewide or regional nonprofit housing organizations, or both, to provide
financial assistance or awards to manufactured homeowners and manufactured
home park owners to improve existing homes, incentivize new slab placement
for prospective homeowners, and incentivize park improvements for infill of
more homes.
(b) The following projects are eligible for funding through the Program:
(1) The Department may award up to $20,000.00 to owners of
manufactured housing communities to complete small-scale capital needs to
help infill vacant lots with homes, including disposal of abandoned homes, lot
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 59 of 94
grading and preparation, the siting and upgrading of electrical boxes,
enhancing E911 safety issues, transporting homes out of flood zones, and
improving individual septic systems. Costs awarded under this subdivision
may also cover legal fees and marketing to help make it easier for home-
seekers to find vacant lots around the State.
(2) The Department may award funding to manufactured homeowners
for which the home is their primary residence to address habitability and
accessibility issues to bring the home into compliance with safe living
conditions.
(3) The Department may award up to $15,000.00 per grant to a
homeowner to pay for a foundation or federal Department of Housing and
Urban Development approved slab, site preparation, skirting, tie-downs, and
utility connections on vacant lots within a manufactured home community.
(c) The Department may adopt rules, policies, and guidelines to aid in
enacting the Program.
* * * Tax Increment Financing * * *
Sec. 39. 24 V.S.A. chapter 53, subchapter 7 is added to read:
SUBCHAPTER 7. Strategic Projects for Advancing Rural Communities
§ 1907. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 60 of 94
(1) “Committed” means pledged and appropriated for the purpose of the
current and future payment of financing and related costs.
(2) “Community agreement” means a binding legal contract negotiated
between a municipality and a person to initiate a SPARC project on behalf of
the municipality.
(3) “Community investment partner” means a person who enters into a
community agreement with a municipality.
(4) “Coordinating agency” means any public or private entity from
outside a municipality’s departments or offices and not employing the
municipality’s staff that has been designated by the municipality to administer
and coordinate a SPARC project during creation, public hearing process,
approval process, or administration and operation of the SPARC project,
including overseeing infrastructure development, real property development
and redevelopment, assisting with reporting, and ensuring compliance with
statute and rule.
(5) “Financing” means debt incurred, including principal, interest, and
any fees or charges directly related to that debt, or other instruments or
borrowing used by a municipality to pay for an approved SPARC project and
related costs for the SPARC project. Payment for related costs may also
include direct payment by the municipality consistent with the terms of the
community agreement.
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 61 of 94
(6) “Improvements” means the installation, new construction, or
reconstruction of infrastructure or development that will serve a public
purpose, including housing, flood resiliency, flood mitigation, brownfield
remediation, utilities, digital infrastructure, transportation, public recreation,
commercial and industrial facilities, public facilities and amenities, land and
property acquisition and demolition, and site preparation. For remediation of a
brownfield, this shall include the cost of the site preparation needed to
stimulate development or redevelopment in the SPARC site as identified in
clean-up documentation approved by the Vermont Agency of Natural
Resources. “Improvements” also means the funding of debt service interest
payments.
(7) “Legislative body” means the mayor and alderboard, the city
council, the selectboard, and the president and trustees of an incorporated
village, as appropriate.
(8) “Municipality” means a city, town, or incorporated village.
(9) “Original taxable value” means the total valuation as determined in
accordance with 32 V.S.A. chapter 129 of all taxable real property located
within the SPARC site as of the creation date, provided that no parcel within
the project shall be divided or bisected.
(10) “Related costs” means expenses incurred and paid by the
municipality or a community investment partner consistent with the
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 62 of 94
community agreement, exclusive of the actual cost of constructing and
financing improvements, that are directly related to the creation and
implementation of the SPARC project, including reimbursement of sums
previously advanced by the municipality or a community investment partner
for those purposes and use of a coordinating agency. Related costs do not
include direct municipal or community investment partner expenses such as
departmental or personnel costs.
(11) “SPARC project” means an improvement, as defined in subdivision
(6) of this section (a). A SPARC project must meet one of the following six
criteria:
(A) The development will improve flood resiliency by protecting the
functions of watersheds, adapting critical infrastructure, or enhancing
emergency preparedness.
(B) The development will include the purchase and improvement of
flood-prone property or mitigate flood damage by elevating, floodproofing or
relocating existing structures or creating new, elevated, comparable structures.
(C) The development includes new or rehabilitated housing.
(D) The SPARC project will affect the remediation and
redevelopment of a brownfield. As used in this subchapter, “brownfield”
means an area in which a hazardous substance, pollutant, or contaminant is or
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 63 of 94
may be present, and that situation is likely to complicate the expansion,
development, redevelopment, or reuse of the property.
(E) The development will include at least one entirely new business
or business operation or expansion of an existing business within the SPARC
site, and this business will provide new, quality, full-time jobs that meet or
exceed the prevailing wage for the region as reported by the Department of
Labor.
(F) The development will enhance transportation and public
recreation by creating improved traffic patterns and flow or creating or
improving public transportation systems, including development of
recreational trail systems.
(11) “SPARC site” means an area and adjoining parcels where approved
development or redevelopment is occurring.
§ 1908. PROGRAM CREATION; GENERAL AUTHORITY; OPERATION
(a) Program. The Vermont Economic Progress Council is authorized to
approve SPARC projects and to finance municipal investments within a
SPARC site or to provide financing to a community investment partner
consistent with the terms of the community agreement.
(b) General authority. Under the program established in subsection (a) of
this section, a municipality, upon approval of the community agreement by its
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 64 of 94
legislative body, may apply to the Vermont Economic Progress Council to use
financing for a SPARC project.
(c) Approval process. The Vermont Economic Progress Council shall do
all of the following to approve an application:
(1) Application review.
(A) Review each application to determine that the improvements
proposed to serve the SPARC site and the proposed development in the
SPARC site would not have occurred as proposed in the application or would
have occurred in a significantly different and less desirable manner than as
proposed in the application, but for the proposed utilization of the incremental
tax revenues.
(B) The review shall take into account:
(i) the amount of additional time, if any, needed to complete the
proposed development within the SPARC site and the amount of additional
cost that might be incurred if the SPARC project were to proceed without
financing;
(ii) the lack of new construction in the municipality, indicated by a
stagnant or declining grand list value as determined by the Department of
Taxes, considering both the total full listed value and the equalized education
grand list value, or the documented need for housing in the municipality as
stated in the most recent housing needs assessment; and
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 65 of 94
(iii)(I) the amount of additional revenue expected to be generated
as a result of the proposed SPARC project;
(II) the sufficiency of that incremental revenue to cover the
incurred debt;
(III) the percentage of that revenue that shall be paid to the
Education Fund;
(IV) the percentage that shall be paid to the municipality; and
(V) the percentage of the revenue paid to the municipality that
shall be used to pay financing incurred for development of the SPARC project
and related costs.
(2) Process requirements. Determine that each application meets all of
the following requirements:
(A) The municipality held public hearings and established a SPARC
site.
(B) The municipality has developed a SPARC financing plan,
including a project description; a development financing plan; a pro forma
projection of expected costs; a projection of revenues; evidence that the
municipality is actively seeking or has obtained other sources of funding and
investment; and a development schedule that includes a list, a cost estimate,
and a schedule for public improvements and projected private development to
occur as a result of the improvements. The life of the project begins at 12:01
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 66 of 94
a.m. on April 1 of the calendar year the Vermont Economic Progress Council
approves the SPARC project plan according to the terms set forth in
subdivision (f)(3) and subsection (g) of this section.
(C) The municipality has approved or pledged the utilization of
incremental municipal tax revenues for the purposes of the SPARC project in
the proportion set forth in subdivision (g)(2) of this section.
(3) The Vermont Economic Progress Council shall determine there is a
relationship between the improvement and the expected development and
redevelopment for the SPARC project and expected outcomes.
(d) Incurring indebtedness.
(1) A municipality approved under the process set forth in subsection (c)
of this section may incur indebtedness against revenues of the SPARC site to
provide funding to pay for improvements and related costs for the SPARC
project development.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of any municipal charter, the
municipality shall only require one authorizing vote to incur debt through one
instance of borrowing to finance or otherwise pay for the tax increment
financing project improvements and related costs; provided, however, that a
municipality may present one or more subsequent authorization votes in the
event a vote fails. The municipality shall be authorized to incur indebtedness
only after the legal voters of the municipality, by a majority vote of all voters
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 67 of 94
present and voting on the question at a special or annual municipal meeting
duly warned for the purpose, authorize the legislative body to pledge the credit
of the municipality, borrow, or otherwise secure the debt for the specific
purposes so warned.
(3) Any indebtedness shall be incurred within five years following the
date of approval by the Vermont Economic Progress Council. A bond
anticipation note is not considered a first or last incurrence of debt. The
Vermont Economic Progress Council may extend the period of time to incur
debt for a period not to exceed three years.
(4) A municipal legislative body shall provide information to the
public prior to the public vote required under subdivision (2) of this subsection.
This information shall include the amount and types of debt and related costs
to be incurred, including principal, interest, and fees; terms of the debt; the
improvements to be financed; the expected development to occur because of
the improvements; and notice to the voters that if the tax increment received by
the municipality from any property tax source is insufficient to pay the
principal and interest on the debt in any year, for whatever reason, including a
decrease in property value or repeal of a State property tax source, unless
determined otherwise at the time of such repeal, the municipality shall remain
liable for the full payment of the principal and interest for the term of
indebtedness. If interfund loans within the municipality are used, the
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 68 of 94
information must also include documentation of the terms and conditions of
such loan. If interfund loans within the municipality are used as a method of
financing, no interest shall be charged.
(e) Original taxable value. As of the date the project is approved by the
Vermont Economic Progress Council, the lister or assessor for the municipality
shall certify the original taxable value and shall certify to the Vermont
Economic Progress Council in each year thereafter during the life of the
SPARC site the amount by which the total valuation as determined in
accordance with 32 V.S.A. chapter 129 of all taxable real property located
within the SPARC site has increased or decreased relative to the original
taxable value.
(f) Incremental community enhancements.
(1) In each year following the approval of the SPARC site, the lister or
assessor shall include not more than the original taxable value of the real
property in the assessed valuation upon which the treasurer computes the rates
of all taxes levied by the municipality and every other taxing district in which
the SPARC site is situated, but the treasurer shall extend all rates so
determined against the entire assessed valuation of real property for that year.
In each year, the municipality shall hold apart, rather than remit to the taxing
districts, that proportion of all taxes paid that year on the real property within
the SPARC site that the excess valuation bears to the total assessed valuation.
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 69 of 94
The amount held apart each year is the “incremental community enhancement”
for that year. Not more than the percentages established pursuant to subsection
(g) of this section of the municipal and State education tax increments received
with respect to the SPARC site and committed for the payment for financing
for improvements and related costs shall be segregated by the municipality in a
special SPARC financing project account and in its official books and records
until all capital indebtedness of the project has been fully paid. The final
payment shall be reported to the treasurer, who shall thereafter include the
entire assessed valuation of the SPARC site in the assessed valuations upon
which municipal and other tax rates are computed and extended and thereafter
no taxes from the SPARC site shall be deposited in the SPARC site’s SPARC
financing project account.
(2) In each year, a municipality shall remit not less than the aggregate
tax due on the original taxable value to the Education Fund.
(3) Notwithstanding any charter provision or other provision, all
property taxes assessed within a SPARC site shall be subject to the provision
of subdivision (1) of this subsection. Special assessments levied under chapter
76A or 87 of this title or under a municipal charter shall not be considered
property taxes for the purpose of this section if the proceeds are used
exclusively for operating expenses related to properties within the SPARC site.
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 70 of 94
(4) Amounts held apart under subdivision (1) of this subsection shall
only be used for financing and related costs as defined in section 1907 of this
subchapter.
(g) Use of incremental community enhancement.
(1) Use of the education property tax increment. For only debt incurred
within the period permitted under subdivision (d)(3) of this section after
approval of the project, up to 100 percent of the education tax increment may
be retained to service the debt and related costs, beginning with the first year in
which debt is incurred for the SPARC project. Upon incurring the first debt, a
municipality shall notify the Department of Taxes and the Vermont Economic
Progress Council of the beginning of the retention period of the education tax
increment.
(2) Use of the municipal property tax increment. For only debt incurred
within the period permitted under subdivision (d)(3) of this section after
approval of the project, not less than 100 percent of the municipal tax
increment shall be retained to service the debt and related costs, beginning the
first year in which debt is incurred for the project.
(3) Retention period. Retention of tax increment shall continue until all
debt is retired.
(h) Distribution. Of the municipal and education tax increments received
in any tax year that exceed the amounts committed for the payment of the
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 71 of 94
financing for improvements and related costs for the SPARC project, equal
portions of each increment may be retained for the following purposes:
prepayment of principal and interest on the financing, placed in a special
account required by subdivision (f)(1) of this section and used for future
financing payments, or used for defeasance of the financing. Any remaining
portion of the excess municipal tax increment shall be distributed to the city,
town, or village budget, in the proportion that each budget bears to the
combined total of the budgets, unless otherwise negotiated by the city, town, or
village, and any remaining portion of the excess education tax increment shall
be distributed to the Education Fund.
(i) Information reporting. A municipality with a SPARC project approved
pursuant to this section shall:
(1) Develop a system, segregated for the SPARC project, to identify,
collect, and maintain all data and information necessary to fulfill the reporting
requirements of this section, including performance measures as outlined in the
community agreement.
(2) Provide, as required by events, notification to the Vermont
Economic Progress Council and the Department of Taxes regarding any
SPARC project debt obligations, public votes, or votes by the municipal
legislative body immediately following such obligation or vote on a form
prescribed by the Council, including copies of public notices, agendas,
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 72 of 94
minutes, vote tally, and a copy of the information provided to the public in
accordance with subdivision (d)(4) of this section.
(3) Ensure that the SPARC financing project account required by
subdivision (f)(1) of this section is subject to the annual audit prescribed in
subsection (j) of this section. Procedures shall include verification of the
original taxable value and annual and total municipal and education tax
increments generated, expenditures for debt and related costs, and current
balance.
(j) Audit; financial reports. Annually on or before April 1, until the year
following the end of the period for retention of education tax increment, a
municipality with a SPARC project approved under this section shall ensure
that the SPARC project is subject to the annual audit prescribed in sections
1681 and, if applicable, 1690 of this title and submit a copy of the audit report
to the Vermont Economic Progress Council. In the event that the SPARC
project is only subject to the audit under section 1681 of this title, the Vermont
Economic Progress Council shall ensure a process is in place to subject the
SPARC project to an independent audit. Procedures for the audit must include
verification of the original taxable value and annual and total municipal and
education tax increments generated, expenditures for debt and related costs,
and current balance.
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 73 of 94
(k) Authority to issue decisions. The Vermont Economic Progress Council,
after reasonable notice to a municipality, is authorized to issue decisions to a
municipality on questions and inquiries concerning the administration of
SPARC projects, statutes, rules, noncompliance with this section, and any
instances of noncompliance. The Vermont Economic Progress Council shall
deliberate and vote and may consult with the Commissioner of Taxes, the
Attorney General, and the State Treasurer.
Sec. 40. 24 V.S.A. § 1891 is amended to read:
§ 1891. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
* * *
(4) “Improvements” means the installation, new construction, or
reconstruction of infrastructure or municipal capital assets that will serve a
public purpose and fulfill the purpose of tax increment financing districts as
stated in section 1893 of this subchapter, including utilities, transportation,
public facilities and amenities, land and property acquisition and demolition,
and site preparation. “Improvements” also means the funding of debt service
interest payments for a period of up to two four years, beginning on the date on
which the first debt is incurred.
* * *
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 74 of 94
(7) “Financing” means debt incurred, including principal, interest, and
any fees or charges directly related to that debt, or other instruments or
borrowing used by a municipality to pay for improvements in a tax increment
financing district, only if authorized by the legal voters of the municipality in
accordance with section 1894 of this subchapter. Payment for the cost of
district improvements may also include direct payment by the municipality
using the district increment. However, such payment is also subject to a vote
by the legal voters of the municipality in accordance with section 1894 of this
subchapter and, if not included in the tax increment financing plan approved
under subsection 1894(d) of this subchapter, is also considered a substantial
change and subject to the review process provided by subdivision 1901(2)(B)
of this subchapter. If interfund loans within the municipality are used as the
method of financing, no interest shall be charged. Bond anticipation notes may
be used as a method of financing; provided, however, that bond anticipation
notes shall not be considered a first or last incurrence of debt pursuant to
subsection 1894(a) of this subchapter.
* * *
Sec. 41. 24 V.S.A. § 1892 is amended to read:
§ 1892. CREATION OF DISTRICT
* * *
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 75 of 94
(b) When adopted by the act of the legislative body of that municipality,
the plan shall be recorded with the municipal clerk and lister or assessor. The
plan shall be presented to the Vermont Economic Progress Council for
approval, and the creation of the district shall occur at 12:01 a.m. on April 1 of
the calendar year so voted by the municipal legislative body Vermont
Economic Progress Council.
* * *
(e) On or before January 15, 2018, the Joint Fiscal Office, with the
assistance of the consulting Legislative Economist, the Department of Taxes,
the State Auditor, and the Agency of Commerce and Community Development
in consultation with the Vermont Economic Progress Council, shall examine
and report to the General Assembly on the use of both tax increment financing
districts and other policy options for State assistance to municipalities for
funding infrastructure in support of economic development and the capacity of
Vermont to utilize TIF districts moving forward. [Repealed.]
(f) The report shall include:
(1) a recommendation for a sustainable statewide capacity level for TIFs
or comparable economic development tools and relevant permitting criteria;
(2) the positive and negative impacts on the State’s fiscal health of TIFs
and other tools, including the General Fund and Education Fund;
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 76 of 94
(3) the economic development impacts on the State of TIFs and other
tools, both positive and negative;
(4) the mechanics for ensuring geographic diversity of TIFs or other
tools throughout the State; and
(5) the parameters of TIFs and other tools in other states. [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 42. 24 V.S.A. § 1894(a) is amended to read:
(a) Incurring indebtedness.
(1) A municipality approved under 32 V.S.A. § 5404a(h) may incur
indebtedness against revenues of the tax increment financing district at any
time during a period of up to five years following the creation of the district. If
no debt is incurred during this five-year period, the district shall terminate,
unless the Vermont Economic Progress Council grants an extension to a
municipality pursuant to subsection (d) of this section. However, if any
indebtedness is incurred within the first five years after the creation of the
district, then the district has a total of ten years after the creation of the district
to incur any additional debt.
(2) Any indebtedness incurred under subdivision (1) of this subsection
may be retired over any period authorized by the legislative body of the
municipality.
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 77 of 94
(3) The district shall continue until the date and hour the indebtedness is
retired or, if no debt is incurred, five years following the creation of the
district.
(4) Indebtedness is incurred upon final execution of a debt instrument.
Sec. 43. 24 V.S.A. § 1896 is amended to read:
§ 1896. TAX INCREMENTS
(a) In each year following the creation of the district, the listers or assessor
shall include not more than the original taxable value of the real property in the
assessed valuation upon which the treasurer computes the rates of all taxes
levied by the municipality and every other taxing district in which the tax
increment financing district is situated; but the treasurer shall extend all rates
so determined against the entire assessed valuation of real property for that
year. In each year, the municipality shall hold apart, rather than remit to the
taxing districts, that proportion of all taxes paid that year on the real property
in the district that the excess valuation bears to the total assessed valuation.
The amount held apart each year is the “tax increment” for that year. Not more
than the percentages established pursuant to section 1894 of this subchapter of
the municipal and State education tax increments received with respect to the
district and committed for the payment for financing for improvements and
related costs shall be segregated by the municipality in a special tax increment
financing account and in its official books and records until all capital
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 78 of 94
indebtedness of the district financed through education tax increment has been
fully paid. The final payment shall be reported to the treasurer, who shall
thereafter include the entire assessed valuation of the district in the assessed
valuations upon which municipal and other tax rates are computed and
extended and thereafter no taxes from the district shall be deposited in the
district’s tax increment financing account.
* * *
Sec. 44. 24 V.S.A. § 1898 is amended to read:
§ 1898. POWERS SUPPLEMENTAL; CONSTRUCTION
* * *
(b) A municipality shall have power to issue from time to time general
obligation bonds, revenue bonds, or revenue bonds also backed by the
municipality’s full faith and credit in its discretion to finance the undertaking
of any improvements wholly or partly within such district. If revenue bonds
are issued, such bonds shall be made payable, as to both principal and interest,
solely from the income proceeds, revenues, tax increments, and funds of the
municipality derived from or held in connection with its undertaking and
carrying out of improvements under this chapter.
(c) Bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter are declared to be
issued for an essential public and governmental purpose.
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 79 of 94
(d) Bonds issued under this section shall be authorized by resolution or
ordinance of the local governing body and may be payable upon demand or
mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such
denomination or denominations, be in registered form, carry such conversion
or registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in such
manner, be payable in such medium or payment, at such place or places, and
be subject to such terms of redemption, such other characteristics, as may be
provided by such resolution or trust indenture or mortgage issued pursuant
thereto.
(e) [Repealed.]
(f) Such bonds may be sold at not less than par at public or private sales
held after notice published prior to such sale in a newspaper having a general
circulation in the municipality. If bonds are sold above par or a bond premium
is generated, the proceeds shall not be used for improvements until the
additional amount has been approved by the Vermont Economic Progress
Council by filing a substantial change request.
* * *
Sec. 45. 32 V.S.A. § 5404a is amended to read:
§ 5404a. TAX STABILIZATION AGREEMENTS; TAX INCREMENT
FINANCING DISTRICTS
* * *
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 80 of 94
(f) A municipality that establishes a tax increment financing district under
24 V.S.A. chapter 53, subchapter 5 shall collect all property taxes on properties
contained within the district and apply not more than 70 percent of the State
education property tax increment, and not less than 85 percent of the municipal
property tax increment, to repayment of financing of the improvements and
related costs for up to 20 years pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 1894, if approved by
the Vermont Economic Progress Council pursuant to this section, subject to the
following:
(1) In a municipality with one or more approved districts, the Council
shall not approve an additional district until the municipality retires the debt
incurred for all of the districts in the municipality. [Repealed.]
(2) The Council shall not approve more than six districts in the State,
and not more than two per county, provided:
(A) The districts listed in 24 V.S.A. § 1892(d) shall not be counted
against the limits imposed in this subdivision (2).
(B) The Council shall consider complete applications in the order
they are submitted, except that if during any calendar month the Council
receives applications for more districts than are actually available in a county,
the Council shall evaluate each application and shall approve the application
that, in the Council’s discretion, best meets the economic development needs
of the county. [Repealed.]
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 81 of 94
(3)(A) A municipality shall immediately notify the Council if it resolves
not to incur debt for an approved district within five years of approval or a
five-year extension period as required in 24 V.S.A. § 1894.
(B) Upon receiving notification pursuant to subdivision (A) of this
subdivision (3), the Council shall terminate the district and may approve a new
district, subject to the provisions of this section and 24 V.S.A. chapter 53,
subchapter 5.
* * *
(h) To approve utilization of incremental revenues pursuant to subsection
(f) of this section, the Vermont Economic Progress Council shall do all the
following:
* * *
(3) Location criteria. Determine that each application meets at least two
of the following three four criteria:
(A) The development is:
(i) compact;
(ii) high density; or
(iii) located in or near existing industrial areas.
(B) The proposed district is within an approved growth center,
designated downtown, designated village center, new town center, or
neighborhood development area.
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 82 of 94
(C) The development will occur in an area that is economically
distressed, which for the purposes of this subdivision means that the
municipality in which the area is located has at least one of the following:
(i) a median family income that is not more than 80 percent of the
statewide median family income as reported by the Vermont Department of
Taxes for the most recent year for which data are available;
(ii) an annual average unemployment rate that is at least one
percent greater than the latest annual average statewide unemployment rate as
reported by the Vermont Department of Labor; or
(iii) a median sales price for residential properties under six acres
that is not more than 80 percent of the statewide median sales price for
residential properties under six acres as reported by the Vermont Department
of Taxes.
(D) The development will occur in an area wholly or partially exempt
from Act 250 jurisdiction codified in 10 V.S.A. § 6081.
(4) Project criteria. Determine that the proposed development within a
tax increment financing district will accomplish at least three of the following
five six criteria:
(A) The development within the tax increment financing district
clearly requires substantial public investment over and above the normal
municipal operating or bonded debt expenditures.
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 83 of 94
(B) The development includes new or rehabilitated affordable
housing, as defined in 24 V.S.A. § 4303.
(C) The project will affect the remediation and redevelopment of a
brownfield located within the district. As used in this section, “brownfield”
means an area in which a hazardous substance, pollutant, or contaminant is or
may be present, and that situation is likely to complicate the expansion,
development, redevelopment, or reuse of the property.
(D) The development will include at least one entirely new business
or business operation or expansion of an existing business within the district,
and this business will provide new, quality, full-time jobs that meet or exceed
the prevailing wage for the region as reported by the Department of Labor.
(E) The development will enhance transportation by creating
improved traffic patterns and flow or creating or improving public
transportation systems.
(F) The project will mitigate flood risks within a flood-prone area or
will relocate development previously destroyed by flooding from a flood-prone
area to another area within the municipality where flood risks are significantly
lower. As used in this section, “flood-prone area” means an area in which
significant residential or commercial property lies within the floodplain.
* * *
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 84 of 94
(l) The State Auditor of Accounts shall conduct performance audits of all
tax increment financing districts. The cost of conducting each audit shall be
considered a “related cost” as defined in 24 V.S.A. § 1891(6) and shall be
billed back to the municipality pursuant to subsection 168(b) of this title borne
by the State Auditor of Accounts and shall be included in the State Auditor of
Accounts’ annual budget request. Audits conducted pursuant to this subsection
shall include a review of a municipality’s adherence to relevant statutes and
rules adopted by the Vermont Economic Progress Council pursuant to
subsection (j) of this section, an assessment of record keeping related to
revenues and expenditures, and a validation of the portion of the tax increment
retained by the municipality and used for debt repayment and the portion
directed to the Education Fund.
* * *
* * * Tax Value Freeze * * *
Sec. 46. 32 V.S.A. § 3870 is amended to read:
§ 3870. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
* * *
(7)(A) “Qualifying property” means a parcel with a structure that is:
* * *
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 85 of 94
(iii) undergoing, has undergone, or will undergo qualifying
improvements; and
(iv) in compliance with all relevant permitting requirements; and
(v) located in an area that was declared a federal disaster between
July 1, 2023 and October 15, 2023 that was eligible for Individual Assistance
from the Federal Emergency Management Agency or located in Addison or
Franklin County.
* * *
Sec. 47. 32 V.S.A. § 3871 is amended to read:
§ 3871. EXEMPTION
* * *
(d) Exemption period.
* * *
(2) An exemption under this subchapter shall remain in effect for three
five years, provided the property continues to comply with the requirements of
this subchapter. When the exemption period ends, the property shall be taxed
at its most recently appraised grand list value.
* * *
* * * Vermont Infrastructure Sustainability Fund * * *
Sec. 48. 24 V.S.A. chapter 119, subchapter 6 is amended to read:
Subchapter 6. Special Funds
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 86 of 94
* * *
§ 4686. VERMONT INFRASTRUCTURE SUSTAINABILITY FUND
(a) Creation. There is created the Vermont Infrastructure Sustainability
Fund within the Vermont Bond Bank.
(b) Purpose. The purpose of the Fund is to provide capital to extend and
increase capacity of water and sewer service and other public infrastructure in
municipalities where lack of extension or capacity is a barrier to housing
development.
(c) Administration. The Vermont Bond Bank may administer the Fund in
coordination with and support from other State agencies, government
component parts, and quasi-governmental agencies.
(d) Program parameters.
(1) The Vermont Bond Bank, in consultation with the Department of
Housing and Community Development, shall develop program guidelines to
effectively implement the Fund.
(2) The program shall provide low-interest loans or bonds to
municipalities to expand infrastructure capacity. Eligible activities include:
(A) preliminary engineering and planning;
(B) engineering design and bid specifications;
(C) construction for municipal waster and wastewater systems;
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 87 of 94
(D) transportation investments, including those required by municipal
regulation, the municipality’s official map, designation requirements, or other
planning or engineering identifying complete streets and transportation and
transit related improvements, including improvements to existing streets; and
(E) other eligible activities as determined by the guidelines produced
by the Vermont Bond Bank in consultation with the Department of Housing
and Community Development.
(e) Application Requirements. Eligible project applications shall
demonstrate:
(1) the project will create reserve capacity necessary for new housing
unit development;
(2) the project has a direct link to housing unit production; and
(3) the municipality has a commitment to own and operate the project
throughout its useful life.
(f) Application Criteria. In addition to any criteria developed in the
program guidelines, project applications shall be evaluated using the following
criteria:
(1) whether there is a direct connection to proposed or in-progress
housing development with demonstrable progress toward regional housing
targets;
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 88 of 94
(2) whether the project is an expansion of an existing system and the
proximity to a designated area;
(3) the project readiness and estimated time until the need for financing;
(4) the ranking of the community on the Vermont Department of
Finance and Management, Vermont Community Index; and
(5) the demonstration of financing for project completion or completion
of a project component.
(g) Award terms. The Vermont Bond Bank, in consultation with the
Department of Housing and Community Development, shall establish award
terms that may include:
(1) the maximum loan or bond amount;
(2) the maximum term of the loan or bond amount;
(3) the time by which amortization shall commence;
(4) the maximum interest rate;
(5) whether the loan is eligible for forgiveness and to what percentage or
amount;
(6) the necessary security for the loan or bond; and
(7) any additional covenants encumbering the improved properties to
further secure the loan or bond.
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 89 of 94
(h) Revolving fund. Any funds repaid or returned from the Infrastructure
Sustainability Fund shall be deposited into the Fund and used to continue the
program established in this section.
* * * Tax Department Housing Data Access * * *
Sec. 49. 32 V.S.A. § 5404 is amended to read:
§ 5404. DETERMINATION OF EDUCATION PROPERTY TAX GRAND
LIST
* * *
(b) Annually, on or before August 15, the clerk of a municipality, or the
supervisor of an unorganized town or gore, shall transmit to the Director in an
electronic or other format as prescribed by the Director: education and
municipal grand list data, including exemption information and grand list
abstracts; tax rates; an extract of the assessor database also referred to as a
Computer Assisted Mass Appraisal (CAMA) system or Computer Assisted
Mass Appraisal database; and the total amount of taxes assessed in the town or
unorganized town or gore. The data transmitted shall identify each parcel by a
parcel identification number assigned under a numbering system prescribed by
the Director. Municipalities may continue to use existing numbering systems
in addition to, but not in substitution for, the parcel identification system
prescribed by the Director. If changes or additions to the grand list are made
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 90 of 94
by the listers or other officials authorized to do so after such abstract has been
so transmitted, such clerks shall forthwith certify the same to the Director.
* * *
* * * Vermont Community Development Program Environmental Review * *
*
Sec. 50. 10 V.S.A. chapter 29, subchapter 1 is amended to read:
Subchapter 1. Community Development Act
* * *
§ 690b. ENVIRONMENTAL REVIEW SERVICES
(a) All agencies, departments, and component parts of the State, federal
entities, and nonstate entities such as nonprofit and privately held companies
that receive services from the Vermont Department of Housing and
Community Development for projects funded in whole or in part by the federal
Department of Housing and Urban Development or other federal funding
requiring environmental review pursuant to 24 C.F.R. Part 58 (environmental
review procedures for entities assuming HUD environmental responsibilities)
may be charged for environmental review services through an assessment
payable to the Department of Housing and Community Development on a
basis established by the Commissioner of the Department of Housing and
Community Development and with the approval of the Secretary of
Administration.
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 91 of 94
(b) The Department of Housing and Community Development may render
these services solely in its discretion. The Department shall not charge for
environmental review associated with HUD funding the Department issues
directly, such as Community Development Block Grant (CDBG) funding.
(c) The Department may utilize these funds for administrative costs
associated with providing environmental review services and other
administrative costs of the Vermont Community Development Program.
* * * Appropriations * * *
Sec. 51. DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT; POSITIONS; APPROPRIATION
Three full-time, classified positions are created in the Department of
Housing and Community Development. The sum of $450,000.00 is
appropriated from the General Fund to the Department in fiscal year 2026 for
the purposes of funding these positions.
Sec. 52. APPROPRIATIONS
(a) The following shall be appropriated to the Department of Housing and
Community Development:
(1) The sum of $300,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund in
fiscal year 2026 for the purposes of funding two existing limited-service
positions for fiscal years 2026 and 2027. One limited-service position shall
provide technical assistance to municipalities, nonprofit organizations, and
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 92 of 94
private developers to aid in the development of infill and missing middle-
income housing through the Homes for All initiative. One limited-service
position shall coordinate funding to distribution amongst State entities and
gather and analyze housing data to ensure efficient use of funds.
(2) The sum of $4,000,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund in
fiscal year 2026 for the purposes of providing funding to the Vermont Rental
Housing Improvement Program Revolving Fund established in 10 V.S.A.
§ 699.
(3) The sum of $2,000,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund in
fiscal year 2026 for the purposes of providing funding for the Manufactured
Home Improvement and Repair Program established in 10 V.S.A. § 700.
(b) The sum of $2,000,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Department of Economic Development in fiscal year 2026 for brownfield
redevelopment. The Department of Economic Development shall use the
funds for the assessment, remediation, and redevelopment of brownfield sites
to be used in the same manner as the Brownfields Revitalization Fund
established in 10 V.S.A. § 6654, except, notwithstanding the grant limitations
in 10 V.S.A. § 6654, projects supported by these funds shall not be limited to a
maximum amount per site. The Department of Economic Development may
award up to the amount of $1,000,000.00 in fiscal year 2026 to regional
planning commissions for the purposes of brownfield assessment. In awarding
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 93 of 94
funds under this subsection, the Secretary of the Agency of Commerce and
Community Development, in consultation with the Vermont Association of
Planning and Development Agencies, shall select one regional planning
commission to administer these funds. To ensure statewide availability, the
selected regional planning commission shall subgrant to regional planning
commissions with brownfield programs, with not more than 10 percent of the
funds being used for administrative purposes.
(c) The sum of $50,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Environmental Conservation in
fiscal year 2026 to develop a water and sewer database and to administer the
amendments made to 3 V.S.A. chapter 51.
(d) The sum of $39,100,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department of Housing and Community Development in fiscal year 2026
for the following purposes:
(1) $15,000,000.00 granted to the Vermont Housing Finance Agency to
continue implementation of the Middle-Income Homeownership Development
Program;
(2) $15,000,000.00 granted to the Vermont Housing Finance Agency to
continue implementation of the Rental Housing Revolving Loan Fund; and
(3) $9,100,000.00 granted to the Vermont Bond Bank to implement the
Vermont Infrastructure Sustainability Fund.
VT LEG #380410 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.412
2025 Page 94 of 94
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 53. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380410 v.1